Massachusetts, session 194th, H3963.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary the Westfield retirement board shall retire Greg Heath under section 7
of chapter 32 based upon any condition of impairment of health caused by Parkinson's Disease
which it determines was incurred as a result of his employment.
SECTION 2. The payments provided for in this act shall only be made after said member
has been examined by a medical panel, pursuant to section 6 of chapter 32 of the General Laws,
which has certified by a majority of the medical panel physicians that said member is mentally or
physically incapacitated from further duty, that such incapacity is likely to be permanent, and
that such incapacity is such as might be the natural and proximate result of Parkinson's Disease;
provided, however, that the public employee retirement administration commission may, upon
request, waive such medical panel examination if the member has previously been examined by
of 2

a medical panel and is receiving a disability benefit as of the effective date of this act. The
commission shall promptly notify the retirement system of such waiver.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon September 26, 2020.
of 2